District of Columbia statutes.
11-703

Judges; service; compensation.

(a)

The chief judge and the judges of the court shall serve in accordance with Chapter 15 of this title.

(b)

Judges of the court shall be compensated at the rate prescribed by law for judges of the United States courts of appeals. The chief judge, while serving in that position, shall receive an additional $500 per annum.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 479, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 16(a)
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(1), 108 Stat. 713
This section is referenced in § 1-207.18.
1981 Ed., § 11-703.
1973 Ed., § 11-703.